Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 1. Regulation of Prepaid and Prearranged Funeral Contracts

§ 26-32-101.
Supervision and audit of funds; approval of investment; promulgation of rules and regulations; licenses.

The department shall supervise and audit the funds derived by any person either residing in or doing business within the state, from prepaid or prearranged funeral contracts providing for the sale of caskets, burial vaults, monuments or memorials or any burial supplies and equipment and funeral services, if the sale is made, either outright or on the installment basis, prior to the demise of the person purchasing them or for whom they are purchased, with the merchandise or service, or both, to be delivered at a future date at time of need. All funds received from these contracts or arrangements by any person either residing in or doing business within this state shall be received, invested and withdrawn according to requirements the department approves. Investment in a bank, trust company or federal building and loan association in Wyoming is an approved investment.

The commissioner shall promulgate rules and regulations for the purposes specified in subsection (a) of this section to include regulation of contract provisions and funds thereunder.

A person shall not sell prepaid or prearranged funeral contracts in this state unless the person is licensed by the department in accordance with W.S.

26-9-203

.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 170,§ 1; W.S. 1957, § 26-152; Laws 1973, ch. 64,§ 1; W.S. 1977, §

26-39-101

; Laws 1983, ch. 190,§ 1; 2017 ch. 15, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, added (c).

§ 26-32-102.
Exemption from attachment or garnishment.

In the absence of fraud no interest of any participant in such fund, contract or investment is liable to attachment, garnishment, or other processes, or shall be seized, taken, appropriated or applied by any legal or equitable process or operation of law to pay any debt or liability of the participant, or any other person who may have a right thereunder. Any funds received and invested as stipulated in this chapter shall be as a trust and are not liable to attachment, garnishment or other processes, nor shall they be seized, taken or appropriated or applied by any legal or equitable processes or operation of law to pay any debt or liability of the person issuing the prepaid or prearranged funeral contract, or both.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 170, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 26-153; W.S. 1977, §

26-39-102

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-32-103.
Penalty.

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00) or by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 170, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 26-154; W.S. 1977, §

26-39-103

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.